District of Columbia statutes.
10-146

Piney Branch Parkway.

The Piney Branch Parkway is made a part of the park system of the District of Columbia defined by § 10-104.

July 1, 1918, 40 Stat. 650, ch. 113, § 1
1973 Ed., § 8-152.
1981 Ed., § 8-146.